Hawaii, session 2025, SB282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 711-1121, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By amending subsection (1) to read: "(1)  A person commits the offense of misuse of uncrewed aircraft in the first degree if the person intentionally or knowingly: (a)  Equips or arms an uncrewed aircraft with a firearm, explosive, electric gun, or weapon of mass destruction; (b)  Possesses, receives, transfers, operates, or produces an uncrewed aircraft that is equipped or armed with a firearm, explosive, electric gun, or weapon of mass destruction; (c)  Discharges or deploys a firearm, explosive, electric gun, or weapon of mass destruction using an uncrewed aircraft; (d)  Operates an uncrewed aircraft and thereby intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly interferes with or disrupts the operation of any manned aircraft; (e)  Uses an uncrewed aircraft to transport and introduce, or to attempt to transport and introduce, contraband, drugs, or dangerous instruments into a prison; [or] (f)  Operates an uncrewed aircraft and thereby causes serious bodily injury to another person[.]; or (g)  Uses an uncrewed aircraft in furtherance of the commission of a felony." 2. By amending subsection (3) to read: "(3) Subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and [(g)] (f) shall not apply to any police officer, deputy sheriff, adult corrections officer, correctional worker, or fire department personnel acting within the course and scope of their duties, or to any other person acting under the authority of, or pursuant to a contract with, the United States or a state or county government, or any department or agency of the United States or a state or county government." SECTION 2.  Section 711-1123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows: "(1)  A person commits the offense of misuse of uncrewed aircraft in the third degree if the person intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly: (a)  Removes, obliterates, alters, or tampers with the identification or registration number of an uncrewed aircraft; (b)  Operates an uncrewed aircraft and thereby obstructs, impairs, or hinders the performance of a police officer, deputy sheriff, or fire department personnel acting under color of their official authority; (c)  Operates an uncrewed aircraft and thereby causes bodily injury to another person; (d)  Operates an uncrewed aircraft and thereby damages the property of another, without the other's consent, in an amount exceeding $750; (e)  Operates an uncrewed aircraft while under the influence of an intoxicant; or (f)  Operates an uncrewed aircraft after the person's license, certificate, or privilege to operate an uncrewed aircraft has been revoked, suspended, or otherwise restricted by the issuing governmental authority[; or (g)  Uses an uncrewed aircraft in furtherance of the commission of a felony]." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request